District of Columbia statutes.
21-320

Termination of custodianship.

The custodian shall transfer in an appropriate manner the custodial property to the minor or to the minor’s estate upon the earlier of:

(1)

The minor reaches 18 years of age, or if the transfer was made as provided in section 21-309(d), the minor reaches 21 years of age, with respect to custodial property transferred under section 21-304 or 21-305;

(2)

The minor reaches 18 years of age with respect to custodial property transferred under section 21-306 or 21-307; or

(3)

The minor’s death.

Mar. 12, 1986, D.C. Law 6-87, § 2(a), 33 DCR 278
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 22, 40 DCR 6311
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 20(a), 44 DCR 1271
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 14(g), 45 DCR 745
Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 602(b), 48 DCR 2087
This section is referenced in § 21-322.
1981 Ed., § 21-320.
D.C. Law 13-292, in par. (1), inserted “, or if the transfer was made as provided in section 21-309(d), the minor reaches 21 years of age,” following “18 years of age”.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 20 of the Uniform Transfers to Minors Act.